android/device/softwinner/wing-common/apkdata/txt2epub/hyphenDicts/hyph_de.dic
n1tra
n1tru
n1trä
nt1rü
n1trö
ntsonn2
n2ts
nt2so
nt3son
nt1sp2
nt1s2t
nt1t
n1tu
nt1z
n1tä
n1tü
n1tö
nu1a
nu1e
1nug
1nu2m.
n1um1g
n1und1
nu2n
1nung
n1unt
1nus
nu1sk
1nut
1nuß
n3va
n1v
n1w
nwe2ges2
nwe1ge
1ny.
nz1an1
nzu3p
n1zu1
n1zw
nä2res
nä1re
n1üb
3nüber1g
nübe2
nüber1
1nün
nö1c
n1öf
3nös
1nöt
o1ab
o1ah
o1alb
o1an
o1as
o2ba
ob1r
ob1sa
o2bs2
o1ca2
o1che
o1chi
o2ch1l
och3m
och1w
o1ci
o1da
o1do
o1e2
o2fen
o1fe
of2fa
off1r
of2sa
o1g
o1ha
o1he
ohl1a
oh1lo
ohn1o
oh1nu
o1ho
oh1re
o1hu
o1in1
o1ke
o1ki
o1kl
o1kr
o1ku
o1le
o1le1r
ol2h
ol3le2n.
o2ll
ol1le
ol1len
oll3end
o1lo
ol1tr
o1lu
o3man
o1ma
om1au
o3mö
o1na
1ona1le
o1ne2
o2n3er1
on1g
o1ni
on1k
o1no
ons1a
ons1p2
2ons1q
on1tr
o1nu
1o1nä
oo2
o1of
o1ph
o1pi
op1re
1opt
o1pu
o1pä
ora2s
oratio4
or2at
ora1ti
or1au
1or2d1n
or1ein
or2g1l
or1g
o1r2it
3oritäten1l
ori1tä
oritä1te
o1ro
or2t1an
or1ta
or1tu
o1ry
or1ü
o1sa
os1h
os1k
os2ko2
os3tern
os1te
o1s1tü1
o1su
o2t1em
o1te
otes1
o1th
oti1s
o1ti
o1to
ot1r
ot2re
ot1s2t
o2ts
ott1r
ou1i
ov1en
o1v
ove2
o3vi
o1wa
o1we
o1wi
o1wo
o1ye
o1z
o2ß1el
o1ße
1p2a.
pa1an
pa2g2e.
pa1ge
pa1k
pa1la
pani2t1
pa1ni
pa1pa1
pa1pr
1parf
3par1ty
pa1th
pa1tr
pau1
p1c
pea2
pear1
1pe2l
pe1l1a
pen1si2
pen1t
peo2
pe1ra
per1st
pers2
p2fei
p1fe
pf1ri
pf1sa
pf1s1te
pfs2t
p1fu
p2fü
2ph.
1pha
phe1u
1phi
1phr
2phs
pi2el
pi1ta
1pl
p1n
po1c
po1l
po1p
por1s2
p1pa
p1pe
pp1h
p1pi
p2pliz
p1pl
p1pu
1prob
1pro1g
1pro1j
3prüf
2ps
p1sc
pt1a
pt1in
p1ti
pt2i2v
p2t1s
pt1t
p1tu
pu1b
1pum
1pu2n
pus3
1py1
p1z
päi1
1q
qu2
2ra2b.
2rab1b
2r1ab1d
ra1be
2rab1fa
r1a2b1f
ra1ha
ra1ke
3ra2l.
2r1alt
r1an1r
ran2s1p2
r1an1w
ranzu2h
ran1zu1
ra1p
r1ar
1r2a1ri
2rart
r2at
1r2a1z
r1b
rb2le
r2bli
r3blie
rch1au
r1che
rch1ei
r3chen
r2ch1l
rch3m
r1da
r1do
rd1ran
rdr2
r1drü
rdrü3cku
rdrüc2k
rd1st
r2ds
1r2e.
re1al
2rec2k
re1go
2reh
rei2n1a
r1eins
2r1emp
1re2n.
re1po
1rer
r1er1b
r1er1ka
r1er1l
2r1erz
3ressantest
res1s2
ressan1te2
1rest
re1s1ta
1re1su
1re1z
rfei2
r1fe
r1fl
r1fr
r1fu
r1g
rg2ab
r1ga
r2g1a2n.
rgens2
r1ge
rgen3st
r2g1lo
r2g1no
rg1sk
r2gs
r1h
1ri.
1ri1al
ri1as
ri1cha
rid2
r2ig
ri2n
r1inf
ri1o2t
1ris1s2
r2it
ri1ta
r1ke
r1ki
r1kla
r1kn2
rkni3en
r1kr
r1ku
r1l
rlek1ti2
rle2kt
r3mac
r1ma
rm1sp2
r1mu
r1mä
r1na
rna1ti1
r1nat
rn1c
r2ne1g
r1ne
r3nei
r1ni
r1no
rn1sp2
rn1stü1
r1nu
r1nä
ro1ben
ro1bl
ro1ch
ro1dr2
rof1fe2
rol2f
ro1li
ro2m
r2on
1ronn
ro1pr
ro1re
ro1s1k
ro1sp2
1rou
r1p2
rpa2t1
r1ra
r1re
r1ri
r1ro
r1ru
rrut3
r1ry
r1rä
r1rü2
rs2
r1sa
r1sc
r3sche
rs3he
rs3hi
r2s3n
r1sp2
rs3s2
r1sta
r2s3t2e.
rs1te
rste3cke
r1s2tec
rstec2k
r1s2tei
r1s2tel
rs3tem
rs3ter
r1sto
r1str
r1st2u
rstü3cke
r1stü
rstüc2k
rstö1c
r1stö
r1su
r2s3w
r1sü
r1ta
rta1b
r2t1ac
rtbe1
rt1b
rt1ha2
rt1hi
r1to
r1tr
rt1t
rt1zw
r1tä
r1tü
r1tö
ru1a
rub2
1ruf
ru3fe
ruf1l
1ruh
1rui
ru1ie
1ruk1ti
ru2kt
1ru1me
2runs
ru2n
r1unt
2r1un1w
r1ur
ru1sa
rust1r
r3va
r1v
r1w
r1x
r2z1eng
r1ze
r2z1in
r1zi
r1zw
rä2chs1
2räg
rä1i2
3r2ä1ni2
1rät
räu2s
räus3chen
räu1sche
r1ö2f
r1ör
2s.
2sab
1sac
sa1cha
1saf
sa2fe
1sag
1sah
sa1ik
sa1i2s.
1sa1j
s3ak
1sa2l.
1sa1le
sa1lu
1salz
1sam
sange1hö4
s1angeh
san1ge
1sangh
1sann
s1ans
1sas
1sat
1saß
s1b
s3be
2s2ch.
1sche
2sch1h
1schi
2sch1lic
s2chl
1schn
1scho
2s2chs
2s2cht
1schu
s1d
s3di
s1dä1
1se
seg2nen
seg1n
seg1ne
sehn2t
seh3n1te2
s1ei1ni
seins3
seit1h
send1a
sen4des
sen1de
se3ne
se1num
se1o
3ser.
se2r1ei
s2e1re
ser1k
3sern
se1ru
s1er1w
se1st2u
se1um
s1f
sfal2
s1fa
s1g
s3ge
s3gl
s3gr2
shad1
s1hei
s1hu
s1hy
s1hä
s1hö
shö2r
1si
si1ah
si1as
2si1en
sie1ru
si1p
si1sc
si1ta
s3kin
s1ko2
s1kra
s1ku
s1l
sla1ti2
s3lo
sloses2
slo1se
s1m
s3ma
2s1n
s3nö
1so
so3b
so1la
so1li
3son
s3ord
sp2
1sp2a1z
s1pf
1spi
2s1pos
1spra
1s2pre
1spru
1spü
2s1r
s3ra
s3re
s1s2
s2s3au
s3sc
s3se
ssen2g
s2s3n
s2s3t2e.
ss1te
2s2t.
1stab
s1ta1b1l
2s3tag
1stah
2st2e.
s1te
1s2tec
ste2g1
1s2teh
s2tei
s2tel
1ste2ll
2s3ten
s4te2n1m
1s2teu
st1hi
st1hä
1s2tic
s1ti
1s2t2if
1s2tim
1stof
1stoh
2s3tos
s3trak
3streu.
3streu2e.
3streu1en
1stru
2s1t1ru1a
1strö
s2t1s
st1tü
st2u
1stä
1stü
1stö
sub1
su2bs3
1s2uc
sun2des
su2n
sun1de
s3va
s1v
s3vä
2s1w
s3wo
1sy
s1z
1s2zen
s1ze
1sä
sä2ß2e.
sä1ße
s1üb
1süc
1sö
2t.
1t2a.
ta1be
ta2b3end
1tabl
3ta1fe
1tag
ta2ga2
1tak
tal1a
1ta1ler
ta1le
1ta2ll
1ta1me
tani3en
ta1ni
tank1
2t1anzu3s2
tan1zu1
1tas
1taus
t1b
t1c
t1d
1te
2tec
te3ck2e.
tec2k
te1g
te2ga
2teh
3tei2l.
tei2n1a
3te2l.
3telg
3tels
3te1ma
ten1au2
ten1g
te2ni
3ten1k
te1no
ten1sp2
ten1st
ten1u
te1o
te1ph
te1rac
te3r2e.
t2e1re
ter1ei
te3r2e2n
3terfes1te
ter1fe
ter1k
4terrichtsa
ter1ri
terri2cht
terrich2ts
te1ru
3te2s.
te2s1e
te3sh
2tes1s2
3te2t.
2teu
te3z
t1f
tfi1s
t1fi
t1g
tge1fä2
t1ge
tgesetz4
tges2
tge1se
t1ha
t2hag
t1hei
t1hel
the1u
t1hil
th1l
th1m
1tho
t1hob
t1hu
t1hü
t1hö
1ti
ti1al
ti1cke
tic2k
ti1cku
ti1en
tie1ru
3tig
ti1li2
2ti2ll
2tim
ti2m2e.
ti1me
ti3oniert
tion2
tio1ni
t1k2
t1l
t1m
t1mo1
t1n
1to.
to1be
1tod
1tom2e.
to1me
1ton
ton1st
to1pa
to1ra
to1re
to1ri
2tort
3tos
1tow
t1p2
tpro1
2tr.
1trad
1trag
1trai
3traktio
tra2kt
trak1ti
tra1ti1
tr2at
tre3cke
t2rec2k
t1re1d
1tref
t1reg
1tret
t3rigen
tr2ig
tri1ge
3triger
1troc
1t1ru1a
1t1r2uc
t1ruf1
1t1rui
2t1rät
2ts
t2s1ab
ts1ar
ts1au
t1sc
t3sche
t2s1e2r1
t1se
ts1h
t2s1id
t1si
ts1k
t2so
ts1or
tsor1ga2
tsor1g
ts1pe
tsp2
ts2t
t2s3t2e.
ts1te
t1sto
ts1u2n
tsvol4l2e.
ts1v
tsvo2ll
tsvol1le
t1ta
t1ta2g
tte2l
t1te
tte1ri4
t1to
tt1rä
tt1sta
t2ts
tts2t
tt1s1te
t1tu
t1tä
1t2uc
tu1el
tu1i
tu1l
1tum
1tu2n.
tu2n
t1und
1tung
1tus
tu1sc
1tut
tvol4les
t1v
tvo2ll
tvol1le
t1w
twi3ckeln
twic2k
twi3ckel2t.
1ty
t2zet
t1ze
tzuset2
t1zu1
tzu3s2
tzu1se
1täa
täh1
t1äs2
t1üb
1tüch
tü3ck2e.
tüc2k
tüh1
ua1dr2
ual3ler3
ua2ll
ual1le
u1al1w
u1be
u1br
2uc
uch1a
u1che
uch1ei
u2cherz
u3ches
u1chi
u2ch1l
uch1o
u1chu
uch1w
uc1k1a
uc2k
u1d
udi1en
u1di
uei2
uein1
u1e2l.
u1els
u1en
u2e1ne
uen2z
ue1ru
ue2rü
ue2t
u2f1ei
u1fe
u2fer
uf1fr
uf1le
uf1lo
uf1ra
uf1re
uf1rü
u1fu
uf1ur
ug1he
u1gr2
ugzeu2
ug1z
ug1ze
u1ha
u1he
uhe1s
u1hi
uh1lä
uh1re
u1hä
u1i2g.
u1ig1k
u1kl
ukni1
ukn2
u1lah
ul1al
u1le
ulet2
ul1f
u1li
ul2kl
u2l1k
u1lo
ul1st
u1lung
ulu2n
u1lä
ulö1
u2m1ak
u1ma
umi1s
u1mi
ump1t
um1sta
u1mu
1um1w
u1mä
u2n
una2
und1a2c
1un2d1d
1un2d1n
und1r2
un2d1s
1un2d1v
un1o
1un1r
1un1se
uns2t
unst1r
un1u
un1z
u1pe
u2pf
u1ph
u1pi
up2ti
u1ra
2ur2c
ur3ce
u1re
u1ro
ur2se
urs2
ur1sk
ur2zu1
u1rä
us1ar
u2s1at
us1au
u2s1ei3
u1se
u2ser
us1h
us2hi
us1ke
u2s1tü
usu1
uti1o
u1ti
u1to1
u2t2s
ut3sa
ut3s2t
u1u
u1w
u1zwe
u1ü
1v
2v.
2va
ve2
ve3la
ve3na
ve3ni
ver1
ver3b
vi1c2e.
vi2el
vi1et
vil2
vi1tä2
vo2n1
vor1
vo2re
vo1r2ig
2vt
2w.
wai2n
wa2ru
1wat
w1b
w1ba1
w1d
weg1l
we2g1r2
wei4ta
wei1th
wei1ti2
1wid
w1m
wo1b
wo1c
1woh
wo1hi
woh2l1
wor1a
wor1i
2ws
w1se2
wun2s
wu2n
wä1sc
x1a
x1b
x1em
1xib
1xik
x1p
x1s
x1tr
1xu
xu1e
x1z
ya1
y1b
y1c
y1do
yet2
y1f
y1g
y1k
yl1a
y1lo
ym1p
y1na
y2ne
y1no
y1ph
y1pi
y1r
yri1
ysa1
yt2
2z.
z1ab
za1ch
1zag
1zah
zan1
1zap
z1at
z1aus
z1b
z1c
z1d
1ze
ze1c
ze1no
zen1si1
zen1tr
ze1ra
ze1ro
z1f
z1g
z1ge1
z1h
1zi
zi1a
zi2ga
zi1o
zi1sc
zi1ta
z1k
z1l
z1m
z1n
1zo
2z1op
zo1ra
z1p2
2z1r
z1s2
zsu1
2zt
z1tu
z1tä
z1tü
1zu1
z2u2c
zu3f2
z1u2m.
zu3na2
zu2n
zu3ne
zu3ni
zu3nä
zu3s2
zu4ta
zvol2
z1v
z1wel
z1wo
z1wä1
zy1
zz2
z1za
1zä
1zü
1zö
ä1am
ä1be
äb1l
ä1che
ä2ch1l
ä1do
ä1e
ä1fr
äg1h
äg1l
ä1he
ä1hi
äh1le
äh1li
äh1lu
äh1nu
äh1re
äh1ri
ä1hu
ä3i2s2ch.
ä1le
äl2s2chl
äl1sc
ä1mu
2ä1ni2
än4s1c
ä1pa
är1c
ä1re
ärg1l
är1g
ä1ri
äri1s
ä1ru
äti1s
ä1ti
äu1el
äu1er
äu3fe
ä1u2s.
äu3se
ä1us1s2
übe2
über1
üb1l
1üb1r
ü2b1s2
1ü2bu
ü1che
ü4c2k.
üc2k
ü1di1
ü2d1s
ü1fu
üge2l
ü1ge
üg1l
ü1he
üh1le
üh1li
üh3mo
üh1re
üh1ri
üh1ro
üh1s
ü1ke
ü1le
ü1lu
ün1a
ün2s
ün3str
ü1re
ü2r1ei
ür1k
ü1ro
ü1sc
üs1t
üs1u
ü1tu
üt4zi2g.
üt1zi
ü1ßu2
ö1be
öchi2
2öd
öf1l
ög1l
ö1he
öh1l
öh1re
ö1hu
ö1mi1
ö1ni
ö1re
ö1ri
ö1ru
ös1a
ö1si2
ö1su
ö1tu
ö1w
ß1a
ß1b
ß1c
ß1d
1ße
2ß1ei
ßen3k
ßensei2
ßen1se
ß1erf
ße1ru
ß1f
ß1g
ß1ge1
ß1h
1ßi
ß1k2
ß1l
ß1m
ß1n
ß1p
ß1ra
ß1re
ß1s2
ß1tr
ß1tu
ß1tö
ßu2
ß1uf
ß3va
ß1v
ß1w
ß1z
